apertium-kaz.kaz.leipzig.lexc
LEXICON A2                 ! (derived/not fully lexicalised) adjectives without adverbial reading;
                           ! <adj> and <adj.subst> readings have comparison levels.
                           !# ескі

%<ADJ%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;                             !# ескі дос
%<ADJ%>%<CMP%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{K%} CLITICS-INCL-COP ;   !# ескірек заманда
%<ADJ%>%<CMP%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}у CLITICS-INCL-COP ;        !# ескірек заманда Dir/LR

%<ADJ%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;                             !# "Ол ескіні ертеден есінде сақтаған, жаңаның жалынды жаршысы болған ақын."
%<ADJ%>%<CMP%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{K%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;   !# "Ихтимал, бу бина башкасы, искерәге урынында утырадыр."
%<ADJ%>%<CMP%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}у FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;        !# "Ихтимал, бу бина башкасы, искерәге урынында утырадыр." Dir/LR

LEXICON A3                 ! (derived/not fully lexicalised) adjectives without adverbial reading,
                           ! so-called "predicatives" (бар, жоқ);
                           ! no comparison levels at all.
                           !# көктемгі, басты, бар, жоқ

%<ADJ%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;         !# көктемгі су тасқыны
%<ADJ%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;           !# "...Самаранч ең бастыны түсінді..."
                                    !# "Аты бардың заты бар."

LEXICON A4                 ! "pure" adjectives - no adverbial and substantive readings, no comparison levels;
                           !# ұлттық

%<ADJ%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;   !# ұлттық тағам

LEXICON A6                 ! (derived/not fully lexicalised) adjectives without comparative reading,
                           ! no comparison levels at all.
                           !# examples go here

%<ADJ%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;                           !# example 1
%<ADJ%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;           !# example 2
%<ADJ%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;                     !# example 3

LEXICON V-ADJ

# ;
: GER-INFL ; ! Don't be confused by the name of the cont.class,
                      ! it's basically just a simplified FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     VERBAL INFLECTION (V-INFL-COMMON)

LEXICON V-PERS-S1-NO3PERSON

%<AGR.1SG%>:%>%{M%}%{I%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<AGR.2SG%>:%>с%{I%}ң CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<AGR.1PL%>:%>%{M%}%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<AGR.2PL%>:%>с%{I%}ңд%{A%}р CLITICS-NO-COP ;

%<AGR.2SGF%>:%>с%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<AGR.2PLF%>:%>с%{I%}зд%{A%}р CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S1

! Used for: -AR-<fut>, -GAn-<past>, -MAK-<fut_plan>, copula

V-PERS-S1-NO3PERSON ;
CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S2

! Used for: -DI-<ifi>, -sA-<prc_cond>, -sA-<gna_cond>

%<AGR.1SG%>:%>м CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<AGR.2SG%>:%>ң CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<AGR.1PL%>:%>%{K%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<AGR.2PL%>:%>ңд%{A%}р CLITICS-NO-COP ;
CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<AGR.2SGF%>:%>ң%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<AGR.2PLF%>:%>ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON V-PERS-AOR

! As the name indicates, used for -{E}-<aor>
! NOTE that: Алма театрға бара<aor><p3><sg> ма? – Алма в театр идёт?

V-PERS-S1-NO3PERSON ;

%<AGR.1SG%>:%>м CLITICS-NO-COP ;                ! Dir/LR

%<AGR.3SP%>:%>д%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP-NO-QST ;
%<AGR.3SP%>:%>д%{I%} CLIT-QST ;              ! Dir/LR

%<AGR.3SP%>:%>д%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP-NO-QST ;
%<AGR.3SP%>:%>д%{I%} CLIT-QST ;              ! Dir/LR

LEXICON V-PERS-IFI_EVID

V-PERS-S1-NO3PERSON ;
%<AGR.3SP%>:%>т%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<AGR.3SP%>:%>т%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON VOL-ENDINGS

%<AGR.1SG%>:%>м CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<AGR.2SG%>:%>ң CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<AGR.3SP%>:%>с%{I%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<AGR.1PL%>:%>м%{I%}з CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<AGR.2PL%>:%>л%{A%}р%>%{I%}ң CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<AGR.3SP%>:%>с%{I%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<AGR.3SP%>:%>л%{A%}р%>%{I%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;             ! Dir/LR

%<AGR.2SGF%>:%>ң%{I%}з CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<AGR.2PLF%>:%>л%{A%}р%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

!!!!!!!   G E R U N D S   I N F L E C T I O N

! This is a somewhat simplified version of FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION.
! The idea was to avoid overgeneration (I don't think that ger+DAGI would take
! case endings e.g. Same for ger+NIKI). Still, this cont.class might be not
! suitable for all of the gerunds. /IS/

LEXICON GER-CASE-NO_COPULA

CASES-COMMON ;
CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<ABL%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<LOC%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON GER-ATTR/SUBST

: CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON GER-ABE-ETC          ! Stuff which doesn't appear after possessives

%+сыз%<ADP%>:%>с%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! 2014-08-16//FMT: this was "GER-ABE-ATTR/ADVL/SUBST"

LEXICON GER-GENERAL-POSSESSIVE-ETC      ! Stuff which can appear after possessives too

%<GEN%>:%>%{N%}ікі%{n%} CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! 2015-01-18//JNW: added <nom>, since it needs a case for transfer, and no other cases are ever added, or even presumed by the transducer to be okay.  But worth CHECK ing..
%<LATT%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}%{G%}%{I%} CASES ;
%<SML%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}й CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON GER-CASE-ETC

GER-CASE-NO_COPULA ;
GER-GENERAL-POSSESSIVE-ETC ;

LEXICON GER-POSSESSIVES

%<POSS.1SG%>:%>%{I%}м GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<POSS.2SG%>:%>%{I%}ң GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<POSS.3SP%>:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<POSS.1PL%>:%>%{I%}м%{I%}з GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}ңд%{A%}р GER-CASE-ETC ;

%<POSS.2SG%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р GER-CASE-ETC ;

LEXICON GER-INFL

GER-POSSESSIVES ;
GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<PL%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р GER-POSSESSIVES ;
%<PL%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р GER-CASE-ETC ;
GER-ABE-ETC ;

!!!!!!!   end of gerunds inflection lexicon

LEXICON V-PERS-IRREGULAR-NEGATIVE-1

%<FUT%>:%>%{A%}р V-PERS-S1 ;
%<FUT%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%{K%} V-PERS-S1 ;
%<FUT%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%{K%}%>ш%{I%} V-PERS-S1 ; ! Dir/LR "...Менің қошақанымды қайда алып кетпекшісің?... (Экзюперидан)"
%<DES%>:%>%{G%}%{I%} VOL-ENDINGS ;

LEXICON V-PERS-IRREGULAR-NEGATIVE-2

%<FUT%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}с V-PERS-S1 ;

LEXICON V-PERS-REGULAR-NEGATIVE

%<AOR%>:%>%{E%} V-PERS-AOR ;
%<PST%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н V-PERS-S1 ;
%<PST%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-S2 ;
%<PST%>:%>%{E%}т%{I%}н V-PERS-S1 ;
%<PST%>:%>%{I%}п V-PERS-IFI_EVID ;         ! барыппын / бармаппын
%<PST%>:%>%{o%}%{I%}п V-PERS-IFI_EVID ;    ! бопты   ! Dir/LR

! Verbal adverbs
%<COND%>:%>с%{A%} V-PERS-S2 ;

! Imperatives
%<IMP%>%<AGR.2SG%>: CLIT-EMPH ;
%<IMP%>%<AGR.2PL%>:%>%{I%}ң%>д%{A%}р CLIT-EMPH ;
%<IMP%>%<AGR.2SGF%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з CLIT-EMPH ;
%<IMP%>%<AGR.2SGF%>:%>%{I%}ң CLIT-EMPH ;                ! Dir/LR FIXME CHECK
%<IMP%>%<AGR.2PLF%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з%>д%{A%}р CLIT-EMPH ;

! Optative/jussive forms
%<IMP%>:%>%{A%}й%{I%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<IMP%>:%>с%{I%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<IMP%>:%>%{A%}й%{I%}%{K%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON V-PERS-REGULAR-NEGATIVE-2

:%>%{M%}%{A%} V-PERS-REGULAR-NEGATIVE ;

LEXICON V-ETU-SURFACE

:%>у FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON V-ESIMSHE-SURFACE

:%>%{E%}т%{I%}н FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;
:%>у%>ш%{I%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;
:%>%{G%}%{A%}н FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON V-ESIMSHE-NONEG-SURFACE

:%>%{M%}%{A%}%{K%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
:%>%{M%}%{A%}%{K%}ш%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;           ! Dir/LR
:%>%{A%}р V-ADJ ;
:%>%{A%}р%>л%{I%}%{K%} GER-INFL ;

LEXICON V-ESIMSHE-NEG-SURFACE

:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>%с V-ADJ ;
:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>ст%{I%}%{K%} GER-INFL ;

LEXICON V-KOSIMSHE-SURFACE

:%>%{E%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
:%>%{I%}п CLITICS-NO-COP ;
:%>%{o%}%{I%}п CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR (for things like боп, сап, кеп, қап, қып, etc.)

LEXICON V-KOSIMSHE-NONEG-SURFACE

:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>й%{I%}нш%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;       ! Dir/LR (sic!, according to the corpus)
:%>%{G%}%{A%}л%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
:%>%{G%}%{A%}нш%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON V-KOSIMSHE-NEG-SURFACE

:%>%{M%}%{A%}%>%{E%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

 LEXICON Adjectives
алқызыл:алқызыл A2 ; ! ""
аңғалақ:аңғалақ A2 ; ! ""
қола:қола A2 ; ! ""  ! FIXME: CHECK: might be n.attr
анализдік:анализдік A3 ; ! ""
желсіз:желсіз A3 ; ! ""
ұдайы:ұдайы A3 ; ! ""
ибалы:ибалы A3 ; ! ""
бірден%-бір:бірден%-бір A3 ; ! ""
бұраң:бұраң A3 ; ! ""
алаңғасар:алаңғасар A3 ; ! ""
бітіспестік:бітіспестік A3 ; ! ""
жаурынды:жаурынды A3 ; ! ""
әулие:әулие A3 ; ! ""
гүлжазира:гүлжазира A3 ; ! ""
тендерлік:тендерлік A4 ; ! ""
ансамбльдік:ансамбльдік A3 ; ! ""
қабырғалы:қабырғалы A3 ; !
қайқы:қайқы A2 ; !
қанжоса:қанжоса A3 ; ! ""
қаракүрең:қаракүрең A2 ; ! ""
қарып:қарып A2 ; ! ""
қималы:қималы A3 ; ! ""
қуатты:қуатты A2 ; ! ""
құбырлы:құбырлы A3 ; ! ""
құюлы:құюлы A3 ; ! ""
қысық:қысық A2 ; ! ""
лексикологиялық:лексикологиялық A4 ; ! ""
майда:майда A2 ; ! ""
манағы:манағы A3 ; ! ""
миналы:миналы A3 ; ! ""
нанғыш:нанғыш A2 ; ! ""
нобайлы:нобайлы A3 ; ! ""
орнындағы:орнындағы A3 ; ! ""
өнімсіз:өнімсіз A2 ; ! ""
өткендегі:өткендегі A3 ; ! ""
патриоттық:патриоттық A4 ; ! ""
сайлы:сайлы A3 ; ! ""
секірмелі:секірмелі A3 ; ! ""
сенгісіз:сенгісіз A2 ; ! ""
синтездік:синтездік A4 ; ! ""
суармалы:суармалы A3 ; ! ""
сырқат:сырқат A2 ; ! ""
таңдамалы:таңдамалы A3 ; ! ""
торлы:торлы A3 ; ! ""
түсініксіз:түсініксіз A2 ; ! ""
ұлы:ұлы A3 ; ! ""
циклдық:циклдық A4 ; ! ""
ызалы:ызалы A3 ; ! ""
жамбасты:жамбасты A4 ; !
паралингвистикалық:паралингвистикалық A4 ; !
претоникалық:претоникалық A4 ; !
фоностилистикалық:фоностилистикалық A4 ; !
айыптайтын:айыптайтын A4 ; !
археологиялық:археологиялық A4 ; ! ""
ашушаң:ашушаң A4 ; !
биохимиялық:биохимиялық A4 ; ! "biochemical"
гаусстық:гаусстық A4 ; !
гидроморфты:гидроморфты A4 ; !
гуманитарлық:гуманитарлық A4 ; ! "humanitarian"
дипломатиялық:дипломатиялық A4 ; ! ""
әлемдік:әлемдік A4 ; ! ""
желатинді:желатинді A4 ; !
заңсыз:заңсыз A6 ; ! "illegal"
иберийлік:иберийлік A4 ; !"Use/MT"
ингибиторлық:ингибиторлық A4 ; !
қақсаған:қақсаған A4 ; !
кірпікшелі:кірпікшелі A4 ; !
конформды:конформды A4 ; !
қырлы:қырлы A4 ; ! ""
минералды:минералды A4 ; ! ""
некрофагты:некрофагты A4 ; !
омоморфты:омоморфты A4 ; !
радиоактивті:радиоактивті A4 ; ! ""
теңкүнді:теңкүнді A4 ; !
халықаралық:халықаралық A4 ; ! "international"
ырза:ырза A3 ; ! "" ! A3 not A4 - subst forms found in google
энклитикалық:энклитикалық A4 ; !
заманауи:заманауи A4 ; ! ""
адал:адал A3 ; ! "honest, acceptable"
ашулы:ашулы A3 ; ! ""
бірік:бірік A3 ; ! ""
жылдық:жылдық A3 ; ! "-летний,годовой,годичный"
лауазымды:лауазымды A3 ; ! ""
тұрғын:тұрғын A3 ; ! "local"
шынайы:шынайы A2 ; ! "true" ! A2 not A3 : comp forms found in google
асау:асау A2 ; ! ""
байыпты:байыпты A2 ; ! ""
дербес:дербес A2 ; ! ""
есен:есен A2 ; ! ""
иен:иен A2 ; ! ""
күрделі:күрделі A2 ; ! ""
кәдуілгі:кәдуілгі A2 ; !"Use/MT"
лайық:лайық A2 ; ! ""
нәзік:нәзік A2 ; ! ""
тақуа:тақуа A2 ; ! ""
тиесілі:тиесілі A2 ; ! ""
шағын:шағын A2 ; ! ""
кедей:кедей A2 ; ! "poor"
дәмелі:дәмелі A2 ; ! ""
шұрайлы:шұрайлы A2 ; ! "fertile" ! CHECK A2
оңтүстік-батыс:оңтүстік-батыс A2 ; !
солтүстік%-шығыс:солтүстік%-шығыс A2 ; ! "northeast
ақ:ақ A2 ; ! "white" ! seems to be A2 -JNW
əріпті%-санды:əріпті%-санды A4 ; !
біржақты:біржақты A6 ; ! "" ! probably A6 not A1: no comp forms?
біртүрлі:біртүрлі A6 ; ! "" ! probably A6 not A1: no comp forms?
дайын:дайын A3 ; ! "ready, ripe" ! A3 not A1 because no comparative or advl uses
жас:жас A2 ; ! "young" ! Probably A2 not A1: no advl use?
кішкентай:кішкентай A2 ; ! "small, little" ! A2 not A1: no advl use?
қою:қою A2 ; ! "dark, deep, thick (of liquids)" ! FIXME: check gloss; probably A2 not A1: no advl use?
лайықты:лайықты A2 ; ! "suitable" ! probably A2 not A1
мәңгі:мәңгі A6 ; ! "eternal" ! A6 not A1: no comp forms
мол:мол A6 ; ! "aplenty"?  ! FIXME: check POS and translation ! A6 not A1 because no comparative forms (at least occasional advl and subst)
сыртқы:сыртқы A2 ; ! "оuter" probably A3, not A1 -JNW
тарихи:тарихи A3 ; ! "historic"
тікелей:тікелей A6 ; ! "direct(ly), immediate(ly)"  A6 not A1 because no comp readings -JNW
уақытша:уақытша A6 ; ! "for the time being" ! Probably A6, not A1 -JNW
бекер:бекер A6 ; ! "vain, for nothing"
кейінгі:кейінгі A3 ; ! "next"
көлді:көлді A2 ; !"Use/MT"
сүтқоректі:сүтқоректі A4 ; !"Use/MT"
монетаристтік:монетаристтік A4 ; !"Use/MT"
ақталған:ақталған A4 ; !
қашқан:қашқан A4 ; !
шыңдалған:шыңдалған A4 ; !
анемофильді:анемофильді A4 ; !
 LEXICON Verbs
сал%<AUX%>%<GER%>:салыш GER-INFL ; ! Dir/LR
LEXICON Guesser
мемлекеттік:мемлекеттік A6 ; ! "governmental"
LEXICON Common ! <- future
аң%-таң:аң%-таң A2 ; ! "amazedly"
